Utah statutes.
53A-1a-513.5.   Charter school start-up costs.

(1) (a)  The State Charter School Board shall use money appropriated for charter school start-up costs to provide grants to charter schools to pay for expenses for the planning and implementation of a charter school.

(b)  The State Charter School Board:

(i)  may use up to 8% of the money appropriated for charter school start-up costs for financial monitoring of new charter schools and to provide professional development or technical assistance for governing board members and staff of new charter schools; and

(ii)  in accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of Education, may use up to $200,000 of the money appropriated for charter school start-up costs for a mentoring program for new and existing charter schools.

(2)  The amount of a grant for charter school start-up costs shall be based on the authorized enrollment of the charter school.

(3)  The State Board of Education shall make rules consistent with this section specifying:

(a)  procedures for applying for and awarding grants for charter school start-up costs;

(b)  permitted uses of grant money; and

(c)  requirements for a charter school to submit the following to the State Charter School Board:

(i)  a budget for the grant money; and

(ii)  a final report on the expenditure of the grant money.

(4)  The State Board of Education shall make rules establishing a mentoring program for new and existing charter schools.

